Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201475-722
Procedure; appeal;
provisions applicable.

Commission hearings concerning
the provisions of sections 75-709 to 75-724 shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act. Any appeals
therefrom shall be in accordance with section 75-136.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 22, p. 1428;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 132;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB545, § 9.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.